Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.175.145

PASS program—Awards.

(1)(a) Subject to funds appropriated for this purpose or otherwise available in the account established in RCW 28A.175.155, beginning in the 2011-12 school year and each year thereafter, a high school that demonstrates improvement in its dropout prevention score compared to the baseline school year as calculated under RCW 28A.175.140 may receive a PASS program award as provided under this section. The legislature intends to recognize and reward continuous improvement by using a baseline year for calculating eligibility for PASS program awards so that a high school retains previously earned award funds from one year to the next unless its performance declines.

(b) The office of the superintendent of public instruction must determine the amount of PASS program awards based on appropriated funds and eligible high schools. The intent of the legislature is to provide an award to each eligible high school commensurate with the degree of improvement in the high school's dropout prevention score and the size of the high school. The office must establish a minimum award amount. If funds available for PASS program awards are not sufficient to provide an award to each eligible high school, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall establish objective criteria to prioritize awards based on eligible high schools with the greatest need for additional dropout prevention and intervention services. The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall encourage and may require a high school receiving a PASS program award to demonstrate an amount of community matching funds or an amount of in-kind community services to support dropout prevention and intervention.

(c) Ninety percent of an award under this section must be allocated to the eligible high school to be used for dropout prevention activities in the school as specified in subsection (2) of this section. The principal of the high school shall determine the use of funds after consultation with parents and certificated and classified staff of the school.

(d) Ten percent of an award under this section must be allocated to the school district in which the eligible high school is located to be used for dropout prevention activities as specified in subsection (2) of this section in the high school or in other schools in the district.

(e) The office of the superintendent of public instruction may withhold distribution of award funds under this section to an otherwise eligible high school or school district if the superintendent of public instruction issues a finding that the school or school district has willfully manipulated the dropout prevention indicators under RCW 28A.175.140, for example by expelling, suspending, transferring, or refusing to enroll students at risk of dropping out of school or at risk of low achievement.

(2) High schools and school districts may use PASS program award funds for any programs or activities that support the development of a dropout prevention, intervention, and reengagement system as described in RCW 28A.175.074, offered directly by the school or school district or under contract with education agencies or community-based organizations, including but not limited to educational service districts and workforce development councils. Such programs or activities may include but are not limited to the following:

(a) Strategies to close the educational opportunity and achievement gaps among groups of students as disaggregated by the categories and subcategories in RCW 28A.300.042 (1) and (3);

(b) Use of graduation coaches as defined in RCW 28A.175.150;

(c) Opportunity internship activities under RCW 28C.18.164;

(d) Dropout reengagement programs provided by community-based organizations or community and technical colleges;

(e) Comprehensive guidance and planning programs as defined under RCW 28A.600.045, including but not limited to the navigation 101 program;

(f) Reduced class sizes, extended school day, extended school year, and tutoring programs for students identified as at risk of dropping out of school, including instruction to assist these students in meeting graduation requirements in mathematics and science;

(g) Outreach and counseling targeted to students identified as at risk of dropping out of school, or who have dropped out of school, to encourage them to consider learning alternatives such as preapprenticeship programs, skill centers, running start, technical high schools, and other options for completing a high school diploma;

(h) Preapprenticeship programs under RCW 49.04.190;

(i) Mentoring programs for students;

(j) Development and use of dropout early warning data systems;

(k) Counseling, resource and referral services, and intervention programs to address social, behavioral, and health factors associated with dropping out of school;

(l) Implementing programs for in-school suspension or other strategies to avoid excluding middle and high school students from the school whenever possible;

(m) Parent engagement activities such as home visits and off-campus parent support group meetings related to dropout prevention and reengagement; and

(n) Early learning programs for prekindergarten students.

(3) High schools and school districts are encouraged to implement dropout prevention and reengagement strategies in a comprehensive and systematic manner, using strategic planning, school improvement plans, evaluation and feedback, and response to intervention tools.

[ 2022 c 75 s 2; 2011 c 288 s 5.]